South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 15, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-15-50.  (A) A person engaged in the business of manufacturer, dealer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer of food or food products must label any food or food products which contain messenger ribonucleic acid, known commonly as mRNA. (B) For purposes of this section, "food" or "food product" is an article that includes, but is not limited to, those produced, raised, caught, processed, packaged, canned, displayed, sold, donated, gifted, or harvested for human consumption. (C) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A), upon conviction, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or must be imprisoned for thirty days. Each violation constitutes a separate offense. SECTION 2.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----